Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6023.01
Immunity.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, the director, the Department of Insurance, or its employees or agents for any action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties under the Insurers and Health Organizations Risk-Based Capital Act.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 45;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 29.